District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2322

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 15, 1966, 80 Stat. 1027, Pub. L. 89-694, § 3
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1822.
1973 Ed., § 31-1052.